Hawaii statutes.
[§440E-3] Authority to subpoena witnesses
and administer oaths and penalties. The director may issue subpoenas for
the attendance of witnesses, with the same effect as if the subpoenas were
issued in an action in the circuit court, and may administer oaths in all
matters connected with the administration of this chapter. Disobedience of a
subpoena and false swearing before the director shall be attended by the same
consequences and be subject to the same penalties as if disobedience or false
swearing occurred in an action in the circuit court. [L 2007, c 279, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next